Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 135C.34, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 135C.34 Medication aide ââ certification. 1. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing , in cooperation with other appropriate agencies, shall establish a procedure to allow a person who is certified as a medication aide in another state to become certified in this state upon House File 2680, p. 2 completion and passage of both the certified nurse aide and certified medication aide challenge examinations examination , without additional requirements for certification, including but not limited to, required employment in this state prior to certification. 2. a. The department shall establish a medication aide certification registry on the departmentâs internet site. The medication aide certification registry shall allow a person offering a department-approved medication aide certification examination to submit proof that an individual successfully completed the department-approved medication aide certification examination. b. The department shall not charge a fee for a person to submit or access proof that an individual successfully completed a department-approved medication aide certification examination. 3. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section . Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 135C.34A Medication aides ââ rules. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A governing properly trained persons charged with the responsibility of administering medications or a class of medications at residential care facilities, nursing facilities, residential care facilities with three-bed to five-bed specialized licenses, intermediate care facilities for the intellectually disabled, and intermediate care facilities for persons with mental illness, as applicable: 1. A rule authorizing a department-approved medication aide challenge examination to be administered by an area community college shall also authorize other department-approved competency evaluation programs to administer a department-approved medication aide challenge examination. 2. A rule which states that before an individual may take a department-approved medication aide challenge examination in place of taking a medication aide course, the individual must provide to the community college a specified written statement, and also state that other department-approved competency evaluation programs can receive the statement. House File 2680, p. 3 3. A rule authorizing an individual who has written documentation of certification as a medication aide in another state to become a medication aide in Iowa shall not include successful completion of a department-approved nurse aide competency examination as a requirement for doing so. 4. Any rules necessary to ensure consistency in all provisions relating to certified medication aide training and qualifications. Sec. 3. ADMINISTRATIVE RULES. 1. Rescission of administrative rules. a. The following Iowa administrative rules are rescinded as of July 1, 2026: (1) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 57.19, subrule 3, paragraph âdâ. (2) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 57.19, subrule 3, paragraph âfâ, second sentence. (3) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 58.21, subrule 6, paragraph âcâ. (4) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 58.21, subrule 6, paragraph âdâ, subparagraph (4). (5) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 58.21, subrule 6, paragraph âeâ, unnumbered paragraph 2. (6) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 63.16, subrule 3, paragraph âdâ. (7) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 63.16, subrule 3, paragraph âfâ, second sentence. (8) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 64.4, subrule 9, paragraph âcâ, subparagraph (4). (9) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 65.17, subrule 1, paragraph âcâ. (10) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 65.17, subrule 1, paragraph âdâ, subparagraph (4). (11) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 65.17, subrule 1, paragraph âeâ, unnumbered paragraph 2. b. As soon as practicable after July 1, 2026, the Iowa administrative code editor shall remove the language of the Iowa administrative rules referenced in paragraph âaâ from the Iowa administrative code. 2. Conforming changes to rules. The department of House File 2680, p. 4 inspections, appeals, and licensing shall engage in rulemaking pursuant to chapter 17A to make any conforming changes to rules necessary to implement this Act. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2680, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor